Hawaii statutes.
[§41D-9] Construction. Nothing in this
chapter shall be deemed to expand the scope of liability of the State beyond
that set forth in chapter 662. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
waive the immunity of the State from suit in federal courts guaranteed by the
Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States. [L 1988, c 266, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next